Utah statutes.
57-8a-311.   Statement from association's manager or board of unpaid assessment.

(1)  An association's manager or board shall issue a written statement indicating any unpaid assessment with respect to a lot owner's lot upon:

(a)  a written request by the lot owner; and

(b)  payment of a reasonable fee not to exceed $25.

(2)  A written statement under Subsection (1) is conclusive in favor of a person who relies on the written statement in good faith.



Enacted by Chapter 355, 2011 General Session

